Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Registration of Name or Mark for Receptacles

§ 2571.
Publication and registration of name or mark of owner.

A person or corporation engaged in buying, selling, or dealing in milk, cream, or nonintoxicating beverages in receptacles, or a licensed buyer, dealer in, or vendor of, intoxicating beverages, whose name, mark, or other device is produced in a permanent manner in or upon such receptacle, may file in the office of the clerk of the town in which his, her, or its principal place of business is situated, a description of the name, mark, or other device so used, and cause such description to be published in such town four weeks successively in a newspaper published therein.
If a newspaper is not published therein, such publication shall be in a newspaper published in the county in which such town is situated.

§ 2572.
Penalty for use of mark without consent of owner.

A person who, without the owner’s consent, buys, sells, takes, uses in his or her business, conceals, or disposes of a receptacle belonging to a person or corporation that has complied with the provisions of section 2571 of this title shall be imprisoned not more than 60 days or fined not more than $5.00, or both, for each such receptacle so unlawfully bought, sold, taken, used, concealed, or disposed of.
For each subsequent offense, such person shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $10.00, or both, for each such receptacle so unlawfully bought, sold, taken, used, concealed, or disposed of.
The possession by a person in the transaction of his or her business of a receptacle, the owner of which has complied with the provisions of section 2571 of this title, shall be prima facie evidence that the same was unlawfully bought, sold, taken, used, concealed, or disposed of.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2573.
Mutilating receptacle or erasing name; penalty.

A person who willfully destroys, mutilates, or defaces a receptacle bearing the name or other device of an owner who has complied with the provisions of section 2571 of this title, or willfully erases, mars, covers, or changes a name or other device produced in a permanent manner in or upon such receptacle, shall be imprisoned not more than 60 days or fined not more than $5.00, or both, for each receptacle so destroyed, mutilated, or defaced, or upon which a name or other device has been erased, marred, covered, or changed. For each subsequent offense, he or she shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $10.00, or both, for each receptacle so destroyed, mutilated, or defaced or upon which a name or other device has been erased, marred, covered, or changed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2574.
Destroying or polluting butter crates or carriers; penalty.

A person who puts any unclean or foul matter into a receptacle, the owner of which has complied with the provisions of section 2571 of this title, or who mutilates, destroys, or pollutes a butter crate or carrier, shall be fined not more than $5.00 or less than $0.50 for each receptacle so defiled, mutilated, or destroyed, and, for each subsequent offense, shall be fined not more than $20.00 nor less than $2.00 for each receptacle so defiled, mutilated, or destroyed.

§ 2575.
Search warrant; judicial proceedings.

If a person or corporation that has complied with the provisions of section 2571 of this title, or the agent of such person or corporation, makes oath before a judge of a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that he or she has reason to believe and does believe that a person has unlawfully in his or her possession or is secreting a receptacle marked as provided in section 2571 of this title, the judge, if satisfied that there is a reasonable cause for the belief, shall issue a search warrant to discover and obtain the same, and may cause to be brought before him or her a person in whose possession such receptacle is found, and shall inquire into the circumstances of the possession.
If the judge finds that the person is guilty of a willful violation of a provision of sections 2572-2574 of this title, he or she shall impose the penalty prescribed therein, and award to the owner the possession of the property taken upon the search warrant.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10;

2009, No. 154

, § 238.